Utah statutes.
31A-22-619.   Coordination of benefits.
(1)  The commissioner shall:
(a)  adopt rules concerning the coordination of benefits between accident and
health insurance policies;
(b)  publish a coordination of benefits guide;
(c)  post the coordination of benefits guide on the state insurance exchange;
and
(d)  work with the Health Data Authority, health care provider groups, and
with state and national organizations that are developing uniform standards
for the electronic exchange of health insurance claims to develop standardized
language regarding coordination of benefits for the purpose of including the
standardized language in an insurer's explanation of benefits.
(2)  Rules adopted by the commissioner under Subsection (1):
(a)  may not prohibit coordination of benefits with individual accident and
health insurance policies;
(b)  shall apply equally to all accident and health insurance policies without
regard to whether the policies are group or individual policies; and
(c)  shall include standardized language regarding the coordination of
benefits process that shall be included in each insurer's accident and health
insurance policy.
